it: Tipo di gestione dello switch: Gestito su cloud; Easy Smart; Completamente gestito; Gestito industriale; Industriale non gestito; Gestito layer 2; Gestito layer 3; Smart; Non gestito; Gestito via web; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de gestão do switch: Gerido em nuvem; Easy Smart; Totalmente gerido; Industrial gerido; Industrial não gerido; Gerido camada 2; Gerido camada 3; Inteligente; Não gerido; Gerido via web; Outro
sl-SI: Tip upravljanja stikala: Oblačno upravljan; Enostavno pameten; Popolnoma upravljan; Industrijsko upravljan; Industrijsko neupravljan; Upravljan sloj 2; Upravljan sloj 3; Pametna; Neupravljan; Spletno upravljan; Drugo
vi: Loại quản lý chuyển mạch: Quản lý đám mây; Easy Smart; Quản lý hoàn toàn; Quản lý công nghiệp; Không quản lý công nghiệp; Quản lý lớp 2; Quản lý lớp 3; Thông minh; Không quản lý; Quản lý qua web; Khác
es: Tipo de gestión del conmutador: Gestionado en la nube; Easy Smart; Completamente gestionado; Gestión industrial; Industrial no gestionado; Gestionado capa 2; Gestionado capa 3; Inteligente; No gestionado; Gestionado por web; Otros
hr-HR: Tip upravljanja prekidača: Upravljan oblakom; Easy Smart; Potpuno upravljan; Industrijski upravljan; Industrijski neupravljan; Upravljan sloj 2; Upravljan sloj 3; Pametno; Neupravljan; Web upravljan; Ostalo
en: Switch management type: Cloud managed; Easy Smart; Fully managed; Industrial Managed; Industrial Unmanaged; Layer 2 Managed; Layer 3 Managed; Smart; Unmanaged; Web managed; Other
el: Τύπος διαχείρισης διακόπτη: Διαχειριζόμενο μέσω cloud; Easy Smart; Πλήρως διαχειριζόμενο; Βιομηχανικό διαχειριζόμενο; Βιομηχανικό μη διαχειριζόμενο; Διαχειριζόμενο επιπέδου 2; Διαχειριζόμενο επιπέδου 3; Εξυπνος; Μη διαχειριζόμενο; Διαχειριζόμενο μέσω web; Άλλο
fi: Kytkimen hallintatyyppi: Pilvihallinnoitu; Easy Smart; Täysin hallinnoitu; Teollisuushallinnoitu; Teollisuushallitsematon; Taso 2 hallinnoitu; Taso 3 hallinnoitu; Älykäs; Hallitsematon; Verkkohallinnoitu; Muu
nl: Switch beheertype: Cloud beheerd; Easy Smart; Volledig beheerd; Industrieel beheerd; Industrieel onbeheerd; Laag 2 beheerd; Laag 3 beheerd; Smart; Onbeheerd; Webbeheerd; Andere
zh-TW: 交換器管理類型: 雲端管理; Easy Smart; 全管理型; 工業管理型; 工業非管理型; 第 2 層管理型; 第 3 層管理型; 智慧; 非管理型; 網頁管理; 其他
cs: Typ správy přepínače: Cloudově spravovaný; Easy Smart; Plně spravovaný; Průmyslově spravovaný; Průmyslově nespravovaný; Spravovaný vrstva 2; Spravovaný vrstva 3; Inteligentní; Nespravovaný; Webově spravovaný; Jiné
zh-CN: 交换机管理类型: 云托管; 简易智能; 完全托管; 工业托管; 工业非托管; 第 2 层托管; 第 3 层托管; 智能; 非托管; 网络托管; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de management al switch-ului: Administrat în cloud; Easy Smart; Complet administrat; Administrat industrial; Neadministrat industrial; Administrat nivel 2; Administrat nivel 3; Smart; Neadministrat; Administrat web; Altele
ko: 스위치 관리 유형: 클라우드 관리형; 이지 스마트; 완전 관리형; 산업용 관리형; 산업용 비관리형; 레이어 2 관리형; 레이어 3 관리형; 스마트; 비관리형; 웹 관리형; 기타
sk-SK: Typ riadenia spínača: Spravované v cloude; Easy Smart; Plne spravované; Priemyselne spravované; Priemyselne nespravované; Spravované na vrstve 2; Spravované na vrstve 3; Inteligentný; Nespravované; Webovo spravované; Iné
lt-LT: Komutatorio valdymo tipas: Valdomas debesyje; Paprasto išmaniojo; Visiškai valdomas; Pramoninis valdomas; Pramoninis nevaldomas; 2 sluoksnio valdomas; 3 sluoksnio valdomas; Išmanus; Nevaldomas; Valdomas per žiniatinklį; Kita
ja: スイッチ管理タイプ: クラウドマネージド; イージースマート; フルマネージド; 産業用マネージド; 産業用アンマネージド; レイヤー2マネージド; レイヤー3マネージド; スマート; アンマネージド; ウェブマネージド; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de gerenciamento do switch: Gerenciado em nuvem; Easy Smart; Totalmente gerenciado; Gerenciado industrial; Industrial não gerenciado; Gerenciado camada 2; Gerenciado camada 3; Inteligente; Não gerenciado; Gerenciado via web; Outro
tr: Anahtar yönetim tipi: Bulut yönetimli; Kolay akıllı; Tam yönetimli; Endüstriyel yönetimli; Endüstriyel yönetimsiz; Katman 2 yönetimli; Katman 3 yönetimli; Akıllı; Yönetimsiz; Web yönetimli; Diğer
da: Switch-administrationstype: Cloud-administreret; Easy Smart; Fuldt administreret; Industrielt administreret; Industrielt uadministreret; Lag 2 administreret; Lag 3 administreret; Smart; Uadministreret; Web-administreret; Andet
ru: Тип управления коммутатором: Облачное управление; Easy Smart; Полностью управляемый; Промышленный управляемый; Промышленный неуправляемый; Управляемый уровня 2; Управляемый уровня 3; Умный; Неуправляемый; Веб-управляемый; Другой
de: Switch-Managementtyp: Cloud-verwaltet; Easy Smart; Vollständig verwaltet; Industriell verwaltet; Industriell nicht verwaltet; Layer 2 verwaltet; Layer 3 verwaltet; Smart; Nicht verwaltet; Webverwaltet; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип управление на комутатора: Управляван в облака; Лесен интелигентен; Напълно управляван; Индустриално управляван; Индустриално неуправляван; Управляван слой 2; Управляван слой 3; Смарт; Неуправляван; Уеб управляван; Други
fr: Type de gestion de commutation: Géré par cloud; Easy Smart; Entièrement géré; Géré industriel; Non géré industriel; Géré couche 2; Géré couche 3; Intelligent; Non géré; Géré par Web; Autre
sv: Switchhanteringstyp: Molnhanterad; Easy Smart; Fullt hanterad; Industriellt hanterad; Industriellt ohanterad; Lager 2-hanterad; Lager 3-hanterad; Smart; Ohanterad; Webbaserad hanterad; Övrigt
hu: Kapcsolómenedzsment típusa: Felhő alapú kezelés; Easy Smart; Teljes mértékben kezelt; Ipari kezelt; Ipari nem kezelt; 2. réteg kezelt; 3. réteg kezelt; Intelligens; Nem kezelt; Webalapú kezelés; Egyéb
pl: Typ zarządzania przełącznikiem: Zarządzany przez chmurę; Easy Smart; W pełni zarządzany; Przemysłowy zarządzany; Przemysłowy niezarządzany; Zarządzany warstwa 2; Zarządzany warstwa 3; Inteligentny; Niezarządzany; Zarządzany przez przeglądarkę; Inne
nb: Svitsjeadministrasjonstype: Sky-administrert; Easy Smart; Fullt administrert; Industrielt administrert; Industrielt uadministrert; Lag 2 administrert; Lag 3 administrert; Smart; Uadministrert; Web-administrert; Annet
th: ประเภทการจัดการสวิตช์: จัดการผ่านคลาวด์; อีซี่สมาร์ท; จัดการเต็มรูปแบบ; จัดการแบบอุตสาหกรรม; ไม่จัดการแบบอุตสาหกรรม; จัดการเลเยอร์ 2; จัดการเลเยอร์ 3; อัจฉริยะ; ไม่จัดการ; จัดการผ่านเว็บ; อื่นๆ